Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1587.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 25, chapter 3, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 25-332, to read: START_STATUTE25-332. Companion animals; agreements; factors; definitions A. The parties to a dissolution of marriage action may enter into an enforceable agreement regarding the possession or care of a companion animal.  The agreement may include both of the following: 1. The periods of time during which each party may have possession of the companion animal. 2. The financial responsibility of each party for the care of the companion animal. b. On the request of either party, the court shall enter an order that provides for the possession or care of a companion animal.  When entering an order pursuant to this subsection, the court shall consider all of the following factors: 1. Whether the companion animal was acquired during the marriage or before the marriage. 2. The basic daily needs of the companion animal. 3. Which party generally facilitates veterinary care for the companion animal. 4. Which party generally provides the companion animal with social interaction. 5. Which party generally ensures compliance with state and local laws and regulations for companion animals. 6. Which party has a greater ability to financially care for the companion animal. C. If a companion animal is a service animal for a party or for a minor who is in the custody of a party, there is a rebuttable presumption that custody of the companion animal should be with that party. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Companion animal": (a) means an animal that either: (i) Is a domesticated living animal that is commonly referred to as a pet. (ii) Has been bought, bred, raised or otherwise acquired for the primary purpose of providing the owner with security, companionship or assistance in relation to a disability. (b) Includes an animal that is used for business or agricultural purposes but that has not been incorporated into the family household as a pet. 2. "Service animal" has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-2910. END_STATUTE